vi: Độ nổi: Lặn; Chìm nhanh; Nổi; Nổi lơ lửng; Chìm; Chìm chậm; Tạo bọt trên mặt nước; Lơ lửng; Trên mặt nước; Khác
fi: Kelluvuus: Sukeltava; Nopeasti uppoava; Kelluva; Neutraali noste; Uppoava; Hitaasti uppoava; Pintapopperi; Leijuva; Pintaviehe; Muu
zh-TW: 浮力: 下潛; 快速下沉; 漂浮; 中性浮力; 下沉; 緩慢下沉; 水面波普 (Popping); 懸停; 水面; 其他
el: Άνωση: Βύθισης; Γρήγορης βύθισης; Επιπλέον; Ουδέτερης πλευστότητας; Βυθιζόμενο; Αργής βύθισης; Επιφανείας (popping); Αιωρούμενο; Επιφανείας (Topwater); Άλλο
bg-BG: Плаваемост: Гмуркащ; Бързо потъващ; Плуващ; Неутрална плаваемост; Потъващ; Бавно потъващ; Повърхностен (попер); Суспендинг; Повърхностен; Друго
th: การลอยตัว: ดำน้ำลึก; จมเร็ว; ลอยน้ำ; ลอยตัวแบบเป็นกลาง; จม; จมช้า; ผิวน้ำ (ป็อปเปอร์); แขวนลอย; ผิวน้ำ; อื่นๆ
it: Galleggiabilità: Diving (affondante); A sprofondamento rapido; Galleggiante; Galleggiabilità neutra; Affondante; A sprofondamento lento; Surface popping; Sospeso; Di superficie; Altro
tr: Yüzerlik: Dalan; Hızlı batan; Yüzen; Nötr yüzerlik; Batan; Yavaş batan; Su üstü patlayan; Askıda kalan; Su üstü; Diğer
cs: Vztlak: Hlubinné; Rychle potápivé; Plovoucí; S neutrálním vztlakem; Potápivé; Pomalu potápivé; Hladinové (popping); Vznášivé; Hladinové; Jiné
es: Flotabilidad: Inmersión; Hundimiento rápido; Flotante; Flotabilidad neutra; Hundimiento; Hundimiento lento; Popping de superficie; Suspensión; Superficie; Otra
de: Auftrieb: Tauchend; Schnell sinkend; Schwimmend; Schwebend; Sinkend; Langsam sinkend; Oberflächen-Popping; Schwebend; Oberfläche; Sonstiges
en: Buoyancy: Diving; Fast Sinking; Floating; Neutral Buoyancy; Sinking; Slow Sinking; Surface Popping; Suspending; Topwater; Other
ro-RO: Flotabilitate: Scufundare; Scufundare rapidă; Flotabil; Flotabilitate neutră; Scufundare; Scufundare lentă; Popping de suprafață; În suspensie; De suprafață; Altele
nl: Drijfvermogen: Duikend; Snelzinkend; Drijvend; Neutraal drijfvermogen; Zinkend; Langzaam zinkend; Surface popping; Zwevend; Topwater; Overig
ja: 浮力: ダイビング; ファストシンキング; フローティング; ニュートラル; シンキング; スローシンキング; サーフェスポッピング; サスペンド; トップウォーター; その他
ru: Плавучесть: Ныряющий; Быстро тонущий; Плавающий; Нейтральная плавучесть; Тонущий; Медленно тонущий; Поверхностный (поппер); Суспендер; Поверхностный (топвотер); Другое
fr: Flottabilité: Plongeant; Coulant rapide; Flottant; Flottabilité neutre; Coulant; Coulant lent; Popper de surface; Suspending; De surface; Autre
lt-LT: Plūdrumas: Neriantis; Greitai skęstantis; Plūduriuojantis; Neutralaus plūdrumo; Skęstantis; Lėtai skęstantis; Paviršinis („Popping“); Pakimbantis; Paviršinis; Kitas
sk-SK: Buoyancy: Ponorná; Rýchlo potápavá; Plávajúca; S neutrálnym vztlakom; Potápavá; Pomaly potápavá; Hladinová (Popper); Vznášajúca sa; Hladinová; Iné
ko: 부력: 다이빙; 패스트 싱킹; 플로팅; 중성 부력; 싱킹; 슬로우 싱킹; 서피스 팝핑; 서스펜딩; 탑워터; 기타
hu: Felhajtóerő: Merülő; Gyorsan süllyedő; Úszó; Semleges felhajtóerő; Süllyedő; Lassan süllyedő; Felszíni (popping); Lebegő; Felszíni; Egyéb
pt-PT: Flutuabilidade: Mergulhador; Afundamento rápido; Flutuante; Flutuabilidade neutra; Afundante; Afundamento lento; Popper de superfície; Suspenso; Superfície; Outro
zh-CN: 浮力: 潜水; 快速下沉; 浮水; 中性浮力; 下沉; 缓慢下沉; 水面波爬; 悬浮; 水面; 其他
pt-BR: Flutuabilidade: Mergulho; Afundamento rápido; Flutuante; Flutuabilidade neutra; Afundamento; Afundamento lento; Superfície (Popping); Suspensão; Superfície; Outros
sl-SI: Buoyancy: Potapljajoče; Hitro toneče; Plavajoče; Nevtralna plovnost; Toneče; Počasi toneče; Površinsko (popping); Lebdeče; Površinsko; Drugo
nb: Oppdrift: Dykkende; Raskt synkende; Flytende; Nøytral oppdrift; Synkende; Sakte synkende; Overflatepopping; Svevende; Overflate; Annet
pl: Wyporność: Nurkująca; Szybko tonąca; Pływająca; O neutralnej wyporności; Tonąca; Wolno tonąca; Powierzchniowa (Popper); Zawieszająca (suspending); Powierzchniowa; Inna
sv: Flytkraft: Dykande; Snabbsjunkande; Flytande; Neutral flytkraft; Sjunkande; Långsamt sjunkande; Ytpoppande; Svävande; Ytgående; Övrigt
da: Opdrift: Dykkende; Hurtigtsynkende; Flydende; Neutral opdrift; Synkende; Langsomtsynkende; Overfladepopping; Svævende; Overflade; Andet
hr-HR: Uzgon: Zaranjajući; Brzo tonući; Plutajući; Neutralna plovnost; Tonući; Sporo tonući; Površinski popping; Lebdeći; Površinski; Ostalo